apertium-bzj.bzj.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Belize Kriol English

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <prn>    # pronoun
# <dem>    # demonstrative Adjective
# <advl>   # adverbialisation

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Tenses
# <past>   # past tense
# <fut>    # future tense
# <pf>     # past future tense
# <pp>     # past perfect

# Point of view
# <p1>     # first person
# <p2>     # second person
# <p3>     # third person

#Onomatopoeia
# <ono>

#Negative
# <neg>

#Pronominal-Adjective
# <proadj>

#Salutation
# <sal>

#Honorifics
# <hon>



# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################


PATTERNS
#N-Two
#N-Specific N-Stems-Z [ <n>: ] N-Plural-Z? Adj-Stems [ <adj>: ] Degr-Adv?
V-Auxilary [ <vaux>: ] V-Neg? 
Verbs 
PRN-Stems(1) [ <prn>: ] PRN-Stems(2): PRN-Stems(3): Reflexive? 
PRN-Stems2(1) [ <prn>: ] PRN-Stems2(2): PRN-Stems2(3): Emphasis? 
N-Stems-Limited [ <n>: ] N-Plural-Limited?
N-Two
N-Specific
N-Stems-Z [ <n>: ] N-Plural-Z?
Adj-Stems [ <adj>: ] Degr-Adv?
Adj-Redup-Stems [ <adj>: ] Redup?
Number
Punctuation
Determiners [ <det>: ] 
Adv [ <adv>: ]
Proper-N [ <n>: ]
Prepositions [ <pr>: ] 
Possesive-Pronoun(1) [ <prn>: ] Possesive-Pronoun(2)
Interrogative-PRN(1) [ <prn>: ] Interrogative-PRN(2)
Interjection [ <ij>: ]
Interrogative-ADV(1) [ <adv>: ] Interrogative-ADV(2)
Conjuction [ <cnjcoo>: ]
Onomatopoeia [<ono>: ]
Negative [<neg>: ]
Pronominal-Adj [<proadj>: ]
Salutation [<sal>: ]
Honorifics [<hon>: ]

LEXICON V-Auxilary  #auxilary verbs
kud:kud     
ku:ku
shud:shud   
wud:wud  
kaa:kaa
mos:mos
doz:doz
kuda:kuda

LEXICON V-Neg    #negation of auxilary verbs
<neg>:>n


PATTERN Verbs #initializing v-base pattern for verb tenses

V-Base

PATTERN V-Base #defining v-base pattern for verb tenses

V-Stems(1) V-Stems(2):
V-Prefixes(1) V-Stems(1) V-Stems(2): V-Prefixes(2)


LEXICON V-Prefixes(2) #the verbs to apply prefix tense

:mi\ >   <past>:
:wahn\ > <fut>:
:mi\ wahn\ >  <pf>:
:don\ >   <pp>:

LEXICON V-Stems(2) 

tel:tel      <v>
seh:seh      <v>
chreet:chreet <v> 
si:si   <v>
sayv:sayv  <v>
shoa:shoa  <v>
geh:geh    <v>
hapm:hapm  <v>
rayz:rayz  <v>
prayz:prayz <v>
tink:tink <v>
andastan:andastan <v>
rifyooz:rifyooz <v>
aksep:aksep <v>
teech:teech <v>
waahn:waahn <v>
du:du <v>
bileev:bileev <v>
paint:paint <v>
akyooz:akyooz <v>
sin:sin <v>
si:si <v>
jomp:jomp <v>
heel:heel <v>
bee:bee <v>
staat:staat <v>
fala:fala <v>
need:need <v>
bles:bles <v>
satisfai:satisfai <v>
kleen:kleen <v>
insolt:insolt <v>
help:help <v>
put:put <v>
chaynj:chaynj <v>
setl:setl <v>
obay:obay <v>
kaal:kaal <v>
memba:memba <v>
gif:gif <v>
get:get <v>
haal:haal <v>
pich:pich <v>
pay:pay <v>
kil:kil <v>
liv:liv <v>
bilangz:bilangz <v>
sway:sway <v>
pramis:pramis <v>
mek:mek <v>
kohn:kohn <v>
ga:ga <v>
noa:noa <v>
goh:goh <v>
gi:gi <v>
gaahn:gaahn <v>
taak:taak <v>
lov:lov <v>
sehn:sehn <v>
aks:aks <v>
tek:tek <v>
luk:luk <v>
sen:sen <v>
eet:eet <v>
hoal:hoal <v>
werk:werk <v>
stan:stan <v>
kyaahn:kyaahn <v>
han:han <v>
lef:lef <v>
pray:pray <v>
kom:kom <v>
bai:bai <v>
kip:kip <v>
preech:preech <v>
gaan:gaan <v>
bring:bring <v>
pik:pik <v>
fain:fain <v>
wership:wership <v>
kehr:kehr <v>
hafu:hafu <v>
fool:fool <v>

LEXICON PRN-Stems(3)

mi:mi      <p1>    <sg>
wi:wi      <p1>     <pl>
yu:yu      <p2>     <sg>
yoo:yoo    <p2>     <sg>
mee:mee      <p1>    <sg>
unu:unu    <p2>     <sg>
Ah:Ah       <p1>    <sg>
Ai:Ai       <p1>    <sg>
dehn:dehn   <p3>   <pl>
ih:ih       <p3>    <sg>


LEXICON Reflexive

<ref>:>self


LEXICON N-Stems-Limited

prafit:prafit     
disaipl:disaipl   
lai:lai   
staar:staar
peepl:peepl
teecha:teecha
prees:prees
berd:berd
flowaz:flowaz
ting:ting
daag:daag
pig:pig
perl:perl
servant:servant
ansesta:ansesta
pa:pa
devl:devl
chroot:chroot
finga:finga
sin:sin
Izrel:Izrel
kingdom:kingdom
hevn:hevn
taim:taim
saalt:saalt
evribadi:evribadi
werl:werl
bowl:bowl
plays:plays
enibadi:enibadi
breda:breda
fool:fool
meetn:meeting
boat:boat
nyooz:nyooz
krowd:krowd
hil:hil
sohnbadi:sohnbadi
sohnting:sohnting
enimi:enimi
waif:waif
hozban:hozban
adolchri:adolchri
haat:haat
paypa:paypa
divoas:divoas
marij:marij
staar:staar
seekrit:seekrit
buk:buk
famili:famili
chree:chree
baybi:baybi
goal:goal
frankinsens:frankinsens
mer:mer
konchri:konchri
rowt:rowt
jreem:jreem
aynjel:aynjel
pikni:pikni
nait:nait
yaaz:yaaz
dezert:dezert
mesinja:mesinja
kloaz:kloaz
kyamil:kyamil
hyaa:hyaa
leda:leda
belt:belt
ways:ways
honi:honi
konchrisaid:konchrisaid
jojment:jojment
waata:waata
mowt:mowt
siti:siti
pramis:pramis 
it:it
laif:laif
evriting:evriting
nobadi:nobadi
Spirit:Spirit
ton:ton
powa:powa
badi:badi
fayt:fayt
cherch:cherch
hows:hows
hed:hed
leta:leta
templ:templ
nayhn:nayhn
Skripcha:Skripcha
king:king

LEXICON N-Plural-Limited
<pl>:>\ dehn


PATTERN N-Two

N-Two-Base

PATTERN N-Two-Base

N-Two-Stems(1) N-Two-Stems(2):
N-Two-Prefixes(1) N-Two-Stems(1) N-Two-Stems(2): N-Two-Prefixes(2)


LEXICON N-Two-Prefixes(2)

:too\ >   <du>:

LEXICON N-Two-Stems(2)

man:man      <n>
son:son      <n>
boy:boy      <n>


PATTERN N-Specific

N-Specific-Base

PATTERN N-Specific-Base

N-Specific-Stems(1) N-Specific-Stems(2):
N-Specific-Prefixes(1) N-Specific-Stems(1) N-Specific-Stems(2): N-Specific-Prefixes(2)


LEXICON N-Specific-Prefixes(2)

:dehn\ >   <pl>:

LEXICON N-Specific-Stems(2)

peepl:peepl      <n>
bred:bred      <n>
ansa:ansa     <n>
gif:gif         <n>
jrap:jrap   <n>


LEXICON N-Stems-Z

day:day     
werd:werd   
ting:ting   

LEXICON N-Plural-Z
<pl>:>z


LEXICON Adj-Stems 
haad:haad     
egzsak:egzsak   
nay:nay   
grayta:grayta
ded:ded
free:free
chroo:chroo
aal:aal
sayhn:sayhn
gud:gud
ada:ada
eevn:eevn
moa:moa
sohn:sohn
fos:fos
Jooish:Jooish
lang:lang
oan:oan
bad:bad
kaina:kaina
meen:meen
aan:aan
rong:rong
Hoali:Hoali
anada:anada
lee:lee
Joo:Joo

LEXICON Degr-Adv
<advl>:>li



LEXICON PRN-Stems2(3)

mi:m{i}      <p1>    <sg>
wi:w{i}      <p1>     <pl>
yu:y{u}      <p2>     <sg>

LEXICON Emphasis
:>ee
:>oo

LEXICON Adj-Redup-Stems
kwik:kwik 
big:big 
fool:fool

LEXICON Redup
<advl>:>\ kwik
<advl>:>\ big
<advl>:>\ fool


LEXICON Determiners
di:di 

LEXICON Adv
how:how
How:How 
den:den
hihn:hihn
ahn:ahn
now:now
Laik:Laik
laik:laik
deh:deh
wen:wen
dis:dis
rait:rait
neva:neva
bak:bak
jos:jos
way:way
oanli:oanli
ya:ya
az:az
gens:gens
agen:agen
stil:stil
afta:afta

LEXICON Proper-N
Faada:Faada
Wan:Wan
wan:wan
Gaad:Gaad
Laa:Laa
Dekapolis:Dekapolis
Gyalilee:Gyalilee
Jaadn:Jaadn
Siriya:Siriya
Jeezas:Jeezas
Betlihem:Betlihem
Herod:Herod
Mayri:Mayri
Joazef:Joazef
Judeeya:Judeeya
Jeroosalem:Jeroosalem
Krais:Krais
Mesaiya:Mesaiya
Eejip:Eejip
Machyu:Machyu
Peeta:Peeta
Jan:Jan
Look:Look
Mak:Mak
Roamanz:Roamanz
Korintyanz:Korintyanz
Filipiyanz:Filipiyanz
Timoti:Timoti
Heebrooz:Heebrooz
Jaymz:Jaymz
Dayvid:Dayvid
Aizak:Aizak
Jaykop:Jaykop
Jerimaiya:Jerimaiya
Nazaret:Nazaret
Laad:Laad
Paal:Paal
Maak:Maak
Moaziz:Moaziz
Jooz:Jooz
Aybraham:Aybraham


LEXICON Prepositions
da:da
Da:Da
dan:dan
fi:fi
fahn:fahn
dat:dat
a:a
pahn:pahn
eena:eena
tu:tu
wid:wid
op:op
bowt:bowt
owt:owt
dong:dong
oava:oava
owta:owta
monks:monks

LEXICON Possesive-Pronoun(2)
mai:mai <pos>:
wee:wee  <pos>:
yehr:yehr <pos>:     


LEXICON Interrogative-PRN(2)
weh:weh <itg>:
hoo:hoo <itg>:
wich:wich <itg>:
Wich:Wich <itg>:

LEXICON Interjection
Wel:Wel
wel:wel
Soh:Soh
soh:soh

LEXICON Interrogative-ADV(2)
Wai:Wai <itg>:
wai:wai <itg>:

LEXICON Conjuction
Bot:Bot
bot:bot
if:if
er:er
bikaaz:bikaaz

LEXICON Onomatopoeia
kyakyakya:kyakyakya
giddyup:giddyup
aiy:aiy
bam-brigidim-buf:bam-brigidim-buf
bigidip:bigidip

LEXICON Negative
nat:nat
noh:noh
nag:nag
not:not
no:no
notn:notn

LEXICON Pronominal-Adj
dehndeh:dehndeh
dehnya:dehnya
hoofa:hoofa
mai:mai

LEXICON Salutation
aarait:aarait
dudu-daalin:dudu-daalin
gud-nait:gud-nait
gudbai:gudbai
heloa:heloa
maanin:maanin


LEXICON Honorifics
mis:mis
misa:misa
mista:mista


PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
